Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB315.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 227 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 227. Discount.--If a return is filed by a licensee and the tax shown to be due thereon less any discount is paid all within the time prescribed, the licensee shall be entitled, as compensation for the expense of collecting and remitting the tax and as a consideration of the prompt payment of the tax, to credit and apply against the tax payable by the licensee a discount of: [the lesser of:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) one per cent of the amount of the tax collected; or(2) as follows:(i) twenty-five dollars ($25) per return for a monthly filer;(ii) seventy-five dollars ($75) per return for a quarterly filer; or(iii) one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per return for a semiannual filer.](3) one per cent of the amount of the tax collected on the first one million dollars ($1,000,000) of taxable revenue; and(4) one-quarter per cent of the amount of the tax collected on taxable revenue in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0315PN0268 - 2 - 1234567891011121314